Mississippi statutes. Title 23. Elections
Article 7. Election Officials.

§ 23-15-211.
Composition and duties of State Board of Election Commissioners; elections training seminar; certification of seminar participants; compensation of commissioners attending seminar; authorization by Secretary of State of additional training days.

There shall be a State Board of Election Commissioners to consist of the following members:

The Governor, who shall serve as chair;

The Secretary of State, who shall serve as secretary, maintain minutes of all meetings and accept service of process on behalf of the board; and

The Attorney General.

Any two (2) of the members of the State Board of Election Commissioners may perform the duties required of the board.

The duties of the board shall include, but not be limited to, the following:

Ruling on a candidate’s qualifications to run for statewide, Supreme Court, Court of Appeals, congressional district, circuit and chancery court district, and other state district offices;

Approving the state ballot for the offices stated in paragraph (a) of this subsection (2);

Removing the names of candidates from the ballot for failure to comply with campaign finance filing requirements for the offices stated in paragraph (a) of this subsection (2) in previous election cycles; and

Adopting any administrative rules and regulations as are necessary to carry out the statutory duties of the board.

The board of supervisors of each county shall pay members of the county election commission for attending training events a per diem in the amount provided in Section 23-15-153; however, except as otherwise provided in this section, the per diem shall not be paid to an election commissioner for more than twelve (12) days of training per year and shall only be paid to election commissioners who actually attend and complete a training event and obtain a training certificate.

Included in this twelve (12) days shall be an elections seminar, conducted and sponsored by the Secretary of State. Election commissioners and chairpersons of each political party executive committee, or their designee, shall be required to attend. An election commissioner shall be certified by the Secretary of State only after attending the annual elections seminar and satisfactorily completing the skills assessment provided for in Section 23-15-213.

Each participant shall receive a certificate from the Secretary of State indicating that the named participant has received the elections training seminar instruction and satisfactorily completed the skills assessment provided for in Section 23-15-213. Election commissioners shall annually file the certificate with the chancery clerk. If any election commissioner shall fail to file the certificate by April 30 of each year, his or her office shall be vacated, absent exigent circumstances as determined by the board of supervisors and consistent with the facts. The vacancy shall be declared by the board of supervisors and the vacancy shall be filled in the manner described by law. Before declaring the office vacant, the board of supervisors shall give the election commissioner notice and the opportunity for a hearing.

The Secretary of State, upon approval of the board of supervisors, may authorize not more than eight (8) additional training days per year for election commissioners in one or more counties. The board of supervisors of each county shall pay members of the county election commission for attending training on these days a per diem in the amount provided in Section 23-15-153.

HISTORY:
Derived from 1972 Code §23-5-1 [Codes, 1871, §§ 340 et seq; 1880, § 121; 1892, § 3601; 1906, § 4107; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6741; 1930, § 6176; 1942, § 3204; Laws, 1964, 1st Ex Sess ch. 30; Laws, 1968 ch. 568, § 1; Laws, 1970, ch. 509, § 1; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 335]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 54; Laws, 1990, ch. 325, § 1; Laws, 2004, ch. 305, § 13; Laws, 2006, ch. 592, § 3; Laws, 2008, ch. 528, § 3; Laws, 2014, ch. 397, § 2; brought forward without change, Laws, 2016, ch. 326, § 3; Laws, 2017, ch. 441, § 37, eff from and after July 1, 2017; brought forward without change, Laws, 2018, ch. 399, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 2018.

§ 23-15-211.1.
Secretary of State designated Mississippi’s chief election officer; chief election officer to gather certain information regarding elections; annual report on voter participation.

For purposes of the National Voter Registration Act of 1993, the Secretary of State is designated as Mississippi’s chief election officer.

As the chief election officer of the State of Mississippi, the Secretary of State shall have the power and duty to gather sufficient information concerning voting in elections in this state. The Secretary of State shall gather information on voter participation and submit an annual report to the Legislature, the Governor, the Attorney General and the public.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2000, ch. 430, § 6; Laws, 2008, ch. 528, § 4, eff August 7, 2008 (the date the United States Attorney General interposed no objection under Section 5 of the Voting Rights Act of 1965, to the amendment of this section).

§ 23-15-212.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws of 2017, ch. 441, § 192, effective July 1, 2017.

§23-15-212. [Laws, 1993, ch. 528, § 1, eff from and after August 16, 1993 (the date the United States Attorney General interposed no objection to the addition of this section).]

§ 23-15-213.
Election of county election commissioners.

At the general election in 2020, there shall be elected five (5) election commissioners for each county whose terms of office shall commence on the first Monday of January following their election. Each of the commissioners shall be required to attend a training seminar provided by the Secretary of State and satisfactorily complete a skills assessment, and before acting, shall take and subscribe the oath of office prescribed by the Constitution. The oath shall be filed in the office of the clerk of the chancery court. Upon filing the oath of office, the election commissioner may be provided access to the Statewide Elections Management System for the purpose of performing his or her duties. While engaged in their duties, the commissioners shall be conservators of the peace in the county, with all the duties and powers of such.

The qualified electors of each supervisors district shall elect, at the general election in 2020, in their district one (1) election commissioner. The election commissioners from board of supervisors’ Districts One, Three and Five shall serve for a term of four (4) years. The election commissioners from board of supervisors’ Districts Two and Four shall serve for a term of three (3) years. No more than one (1) commissioner shall be a resident of and reside in each supervisors district of the county; it being the purpose of this section that the county board of election commissioners shall consist of one (1) person from each supervisors district of the county and that each commissioner be elected from the supervisors district in which he or she resides.

Candidates for county election commissioner shall qualify by filing with the clerk of the board of supervisors of their respective counties a petition personally signed by not less than fifty (50) qualified electors of the supervisors district in which they reside, requesting that they be a candidate, by 5:00 p.m. not later than the first Monday in June of the year in which the election occurs and unless the petition is filed within the required time, their names shall not be placed upon the ballot. All candidates shall declare in writing their party affiliation, if any, to the board of supervisors, and such party affiliation shall be shown on the official ballot.

The petition shall have attached thereto a certificate of the county registrar showing the number of qualified electors on each petition, which shall be furnished by the registrar on request. The board shall determine the sufficiency of the petition, and if the petition contains the required number of signatures and is filed within the time required, the president of the board shall verify that the candidate is a resident of the supervisors district in which he or she seeks election and that the candidate is otherwise qualified as provided by law, and shall certify that the candidate is qualified to the chair or secretary of the county election commission and the names of the candidates shall be placed upon the ballot for the ensuing election. No county election commissioner shall serve or be considered as elected until he or she has received a majority of the votes cast for the position or post for which he or she is a candidate. If a majority vote is not received in the first election, then the two (2) candidates receiving the most votes for each position or post shall be placed upon the ballot for a second election to be held three (3) weeks later in accordance with appropriate procedures followed in other elections involving runoff candidates.

Upon taking office, the county election commissioners shall organize by electing a chair and a secretary.

It shall be the duty of the chair to have the official ballot printed and distributed at each general or special election.

HISTORY:
Derived from 1972 Code §§23-5-3 [Codes, 1871, §§ 340 et seq; 1880, § 121; 1892, § 3602; 1906, § 4108; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6742; 1930, § 6177; 1942, § 3205; Laws, 1968, ch. 568, § 2; Laws, 1978, ch. 431, § 1; Laws, 1979, ch. 359, § 1; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 335]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 55; Laws, 2000, ch. 592, § 2; Laws, 2009, ch. 437, § 1; Laws, 2017, ch. 441, § 38, eff from and after July 1, 2017; Laws, 2018, ch. 399, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2018.

§ 23-15-213.
Election of county election commissioners.

[From and after January 1, 2023, this section shall read as follows:]

There shall be elected five (5) election commissioners for each county whose terms of office shall commence on the first Monday of January following their election and who shall serve for a term of four (4) years. Each of the commissioners shall be required to attend a training seminar provided by the Secretary of State and satisfactorily complete a skills assessment, and before acting, shall take and subscribe the oath of office prescribed by the Constitution. The oath shall be filed in the office of the clerk of the chancery court. Upon filing the oath of office, the election commissioner may be provided access to the Statewide Elections Management System for the purpose of performing his or her duties. While engaged in their duties, the commissioners shall be conservators of the peace in the county, with all the duties and powers of such.

At the general election in 2024 and every four (4) years thereafter, the qualified electors of the board of supervisors’ Districts One, Three and Five shall elect in their district one (1) election commissioner.

At the general election in 2023 and every four (4) years thereafter, the qualified electors of the board of supervisors’ Districts Two and Four shall elect in their district one (1) election commissioner.

No more than one (1) commissioner shall be a resident of and reside in each supervisors district of the county; it being the purpose of this section that the county board of election commissioners shall consist of one (1) person from each supervisors district of the county and that each commissioner be elected from the supervisors district in which he or she resides.

Candidates for county election commissioner shall qualify by filing with the clerk of the board of supervisors of their respective counties a petition personally signed by not less than fifty (50) qualified electors of the supervisors district in which they reside, requesting that they be a candidate, by 5:00 p.m. not later than the first Monday in June of the year in which the election occurs and unless the petition is filed within the required time, their names shall not be placed upon the ballot. All candidates shall declare in writing their party affiliation, if any, to the board of supervisors, and such party affiliation shall be shown on the official ballot.

The petition shall have attached thereto a certificate of the county registrar showing the number of qualified electors on each petition, which shall be furnished by the registrar on request. The board shall determine the sufficiency of the petition, and if the petition contains the required number of signatures and is filed within the time required, the president of the board shall verify that the candidate is a resident of the supervisors district in which he or she seeks election and that the candidate is otherwise qualified as provided by law, and shall certify that the candidate is qualified to the chair or secretary of the county election commission and the names of the candidates shall be placed upon the ballot for the ensuing election. No county election commissioner shall serve or be considered as elected until he or she has received a majority of the votes cast for the position or post for which he or she is a candidate. If a majority vote is not received in the first election, then the two (2) candidates receiving the most votes for each position or post shall be placed upon the ballot for a second election to be held three (3) weeks later in accordance with appropriate procedures followed in other elections involving runoff candidates.

In the first meeting in January of each year, the county election commissioners shall organize by electing a chair and a secretary, who shall serve a one (1) year term. The county election commissioners shall provide the names of the chair and secretary to the Secretary of State and provide notice of any change in officers which may occur during the year.

It shall be the duty of the chair to have the official ballot printed and distributed at each general or special election.

HISTORY:
Derived from 1972 Code §§23-5-3 [Codes, 1871, §§ 340 et seq; 1880, § 121; 1892, § 3602; 1906, § 4108; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6742; 1930, § 6177; 1942, § 3205; Laws, 1968, ch. 568, § 2; Laws, 1978, ch. 431, § 1; Laws, 1979, ch. 359, § 1; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 335]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 55; Laws, 2000, ch. 592, § 2; Laws, 2009, ch. 437, § 1; Laws, 2017, ch. 441, § 38, eff from and after July 1, 2017; Laws, 2018, ch. 399, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2018; Laws, 2018, ch. 399, § 1, eff from and after January 7, 2018.

§ 23-15-215.
Performance by board of supervisors of election commissioners’ duties.

If there shall not be election commissioners in any county, or if they fail to act, the duties prescribed for them shall be performed by the board of supervisors. In such case, the president of the board is charged with the duty of having the official ballot printed and distributed; and the poll managers shall make returns to the board, which shall canvass the returns, give certificates of election, and make report to the Secretary of State, in like manner as the election commissioners are required to do.

HISTORY:
Derived from 1972 Code §§23-5-177 [Codes, 1880, § 132, 1892, § 3642; 1906, § 4149; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6783; 1930, § 6254; 1942, § 3283; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 335]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 56; Laws, 2017, ch. 441, § 39, eff from and after July 1, 2017.

§ 23-15-217.
County election commissioner authorized to be candidate for other office; resignation from office; duties and powers of board of supervisors where election of county election commissioner is contested.

An election commissioner of any county may be a candidate for any other office at any election held or to be held during the four-year term for which he or she has been elected to the office of election commissioner; provided that he or she has resigned from the office of election commissioner before he or she files to qualify for the office that he or she desires to seek. The clerk for the board of supervisors must have actually received the resignation for it to be deemed submitted.

In any case involving the election of a county election commissioner wherein there is a contest of any nature, including, but not limited to, the right of any person to vote or the counting of any challenge ballot, all the duties and powers of the commission in connection with the contest shall be performed by the board of supervisors, as is contemplated by Section 23-15-215 in cases where there are no election commissioners in the county.

HISTORY:
Derived from 1972 Code §§23-5-95 [Codes, 1871, § 342; 1880, § 122; 1892, § 3634; 1906, § 4141; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6775; 1930, § 6213; 1942, § 3242; Laws, 1968, ch. 568, § 3; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 331]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 57; Laws, 1989, ch. 483, § 1; Laws, 1991, ch. 613, § 1; Laws, 2003, ch. 447, § 1; Laws, 2013, ch. 474, § 1; Laws, 2017, ch. 441, § 40, eff from and after July 1, 2017.

§ 23-15-219.
Employment by board of election commissioners of investigators, legal counsel and others.

The board of election commissioners is hereby authorized and empowered to employ and set or determine the duties of and determine the compensation of such investigators, legal counsel, secretaries, technical advisors and any other employees or persons who or which the board or a majority thereof may deem necessary to enable them to discharge the duties and obligations presently or hereafter vested in them. However, before employing such persons or setting or determining the compensation, the election commissioners must first have the approval of the board of supervisors of the county.

The board of supervisors of the county is authorized and empowered to pay out of the general fund of the county the salaries and necessary traveling and subsistence expenses of the employees of the board of election commissioners in such amounts as may be mutually agreed upon by the board of supervisors and board of election commissioners, but which shall be computed on the same basis allowed to state employees when traveling on state business. All expense accounts of the employees of the board of election commissioners shall be approved by the board of election commissioners and the board of supervisors or, in the discretion of each of the boards, by one (1) of the members of each of the boards duly authorized by the respective boards to approve or disapprove the subsistence, traveling and mileage expense accounts.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit a person who holds the office of election commissioner from being employed and receiving compensation pursuant to this section.Any compensation which such a person may receive from his or her employment pursuant to this section shall be in addition to any compensation that person may receive in performing his or her duties as an election commissioner.

HISTORY:
Derived from 1972 Code §23-5-97 [Codes, 1942, § 3242.5; Laws, 1966, Ex Sess, ch. 33, §§ 1, 2; Laws, 1983, ch. 363; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 335]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 58; Laws, 2017, ch. 441, § 41, eff from and after July 1, 2017.

§ 23-15-221.
Appointment and duties of municipal election commissioners; election by municipality to abolish municipal election commissioners in the municipality’s county; municipal election commissioners’ duties assumed by county election commissioners.

The governing authorities of municipalities having a population of less than twenty thousand (20,000) inhabitants according to the last federal decennial census shall appoint three (3) election commissioners; the governing authorities of municipalities having a population of twenty thousand (20,000) inhabitants or more and less than one hundred thousand (100,000) inhabitants according to the last federal decennial census shall appoint five (5) election commissioners; and the governing authorities of municipalities having a population of one hundred thousand (100,000) or more according to the last federal decennial census shall appoint seven (7) election commissioners. The municipal election commissioners, in conjunction with the municipal clerk, shall perform all the duties in respect to the municipal election prescribed by law to be performed by the county election commissioners where not otherwise provided. The election commissioners shall, in case there be but one (1) election precinct in the municipality, act as poll managers themselves.

The city council or board of aldermen or other governing authority of any municipality desiring to avail itself of the provisions of the Mississippi Election Code regarding the duties of municipal election commissioners shall adopt an ordinance declaring its intention to enter into an agreement with the municipality’s county to have the county election commissioners conduct municipal elections and other functions that are performed by municipal election commissioners for the benefit of the efficiency and conformity of elections, to be effective on and after a date fixed in the ordinance which must be at least thirty (30) days after the ordinance is adopted and on the first day of a month. If the municipality is located in more than one (1) county, the municipality shall choose which county it wants to conduct its elections and other duties of its municipal election commissioners and enter into an agreement with that county to have that county’s election commissioners conduct the municipal elections and other functions that are performed by municipal election commissioners for the benefit of the efficiency and conformity of elections, to be effective on and after a date fixed in the ordinance which must be at least thirty (30) days after the ordinance is adopted and on the first day of a month. A certified copy of this ordinance shall be immediately forwarded to the Chair of the State Board of Election Commissioners. The municipal authorities shall have a copy of the ordinance published once a week for three (3) consecutive weeks in at least one (1) newspaper published in the municipality and having a general circulation therein. The first publication shall be not less than twenty-eight (28) days before the effective date fixed in the ordinance, and the last publication shall be made not less than seven (7) days before such date. If no newspaper is published in the municipality, then notice shall be given by publishing the ordinance for the required time in some newspaper published in the same or an adjoining county having a general circulation in the municipality. A copy of the ordinance shall also be posted at three (3) public places in the municipality for a period of at least twenty-one (21) days during the time of its publication in a newspaper. The publication of the ordinance may be made as provided in Section 21-17-19. Proof of publication must also be furnished to the Chair of the State Board of Election Commissioners.

If a city council or board of aldermen or other governing authority of any municipality adopts an ordinance to abolish municipal election commissioners in the municipality’s county and authorize county election commissioners to conduct the municipal election commissioners’ duties, the county election commissioners shall conduct all of the duties of the municipal election commissioners including, but not limited to:

Canvass the results of bond elections in a municipality;

Canvass the returns of special and general elections for mayor and councilmen and within five (5) days after any special or general election, deliver to each person receiving the highest number of votes a certificate of election;

Certify to the Secretary of State the name or names of the person or persons elected at special and general elections within ten (10) days after any special or general election;

Revise the primary pollbooks for municipalities at the time and in the manner and in accordance with the laws now fixed and in force for revising pollbooks, except they shall not remove from the pollbook any person who is qualified to participate in primary elections;

Print the pollbooks that are to be used in municipal elections;

Print and distribute the “official ballots”;

Perform the duties of poll managers in the event there is only one (1) election precinct in the municipality;

Perform any of the duties required of the municipal executive committee pursuant to Section 23-15-239 if the municipal executive committee has entered into a written agreement with the municipal clerk or the municipal or county election commission that gives such authorization;

Determine whether each party candidate in the municipal general election is a qualified elector of the municipality, and of the ward if the office sought is a ward office, whether each candidate either meets all other qualifications to hold the office he or she is seeking or presents absolute proof that he or she will, subject to no contingencies, meet all qualifications on or before the date of the general or special election at which he or she could be elected to office, and whether any candidate has been convicted of any felony in a court of this state, or has been convicted on or after December 8, 1992, of any offense in another state which is a felony under the laws of this state, or has been convicted of any felony in a federal court on or after December 8, 1992;

Declare each candidate elected without opposition, if the candidate meets all the qualifications to hold the office as determined pursuant to a review by the commission in accordance with the provisions of paragraph (i) of this subsection (3);

Canvass the returns for municipal elections received from all voting precincts and within ten (10) days after the election, deliver to each person receiving the highest number of votes a certificate of election. If it shall appear that any two (2) or more of the candidates receiving the highest number of votes shall have received an equal number of votes, the election shall be decided by the toss of a coin or by lot, fairly and publicly drawn by the election commissioners;

Transmit the statement provided in Section 23-15-611 to the Secretary of State certifying the name or names of the person or persons elected at municipal elections, and such person or persons shall be issued commissions by the Governor;

Receiving the filed document by any person desiring to contest the qualifications of another person who has qualified pursuant to the provisions of Section 23-15-361 as a candidate for municipal office elected on the date designated by law for regular municipal elections that specifically sets forth the grounds of the challenge no later than thirty-one (31) days after the date of the first primary election set forth in Section 23-15-309; and

Perform all other duties with respect to the municipal election prescribed by law.

If the city council or board of aldermen or other governing authority of any municipality does not desire to avail itself of the provisions of the Mississippi Election Code regarding the duties of municipal election commissioners, then nothing in this section shall be construed in any way to affect, alter or modify the existence of those municipal election commissioners now operating under the laws relating to municipal election commissioners provided in the Mississippi Code of 1972. Those municipalities shall continue to enjoy the form of election commissions and the conduct of the respective elections that are now enjoyed by them, and each shall possess all rights, powers, privileges and immunities granted and conferred under the laws relating to municipal election commissioners provided in the Mississippi Code of 1972.

HISTORY:
Derived from 1972 Code §23-11-13 [Codes, 1942, § 3203-105; Laws, 1972, ch. 490, § 105; Repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 490, § 345]; En, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 59; Laws, 2017, ch. 441, § 42, eff from and after July 1, 2017.

§ 23-15-223.
County registrar shall be circuit court clerk unless found improper; appointment of deputy registrars; liability of registrar for malfeasance or nonfeasance of deputy registrar; computer skills training course.

The State Board of Election Commissioners, on or before the fifteenth day of February succeeding each general election, shall appoint in the several counties registrars of elections, who shall hold office for four (4) years and until their successors shall be duly qualified. The county registrar shall be the clerk of the circuit court, unless the State Board of Election Commissioners finds the circuit clerk to be an improper person to register the names of the electors in the county. The State Board of Election Commissioners shall draft rules and regulations to provide for notice and hearing before removal of the circuit clerk, if notice and a hearing is practicable under the circumstances.

The county registrar is empowered to appoint deputy registrars, with the consent of the board of election commissioners, who may discharge the duties of the registrar.

The clerk of every municipality shall be appointed as such a deputy registrar, as contemplated by the National Voter Registration Act (NVRA).

The county registrar shall not be held liable for any malfeasance or nonfeasance in office by any deputy registrar who is a deputy registrar by virtue of his or her office.

The Secretary of State, in conjunction with the State Board of Community and Junior Colleges, has developed and made available online a computer skills training course for all newly appointed registrars that shall be completed within one hundred eighty (180) days of the commencement of their term of office.

HISTORY:
Derived from 1972 Code §23-5-7 [Codes, 1892, § 3603; 1906, § 4109; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6743; 1930, § 6178; 1942, § 3206; Laws, 1900, ch. 75; Laws, 1984, ch. 460, § 1; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 335]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 60; Laws, 1988, ch. 350, § 4; Laws, 2009, ch. 400, § 1; Laws, 2017, ch. 441, § 43, eff from and after July 1, 2017.

§ 23-15-225.
Compensation of registrars.

[Effective from and after January 1, 2020, this section will read as follows:]

The registrar shall be entitled to such compensation, payable monthly out of the county treasury, which the board of supervisors of the county shall allow on an annual basis in the following amounts:

For counties with a total population of more than two hundred thousand (200,000), an amount not to exceed Thirty-one Thousand Three Hundred Ninety-five Dollars ($31,395.00), but not less than Nine Thousand Six Hundred Sixty Dollars ($9,660.00).

For counties with a total population of more than one hundred thousand (100,000) and not more than two hundred thousand (200,000), an amount not to exceed Twenty-six Thousand Five Hundred Sixty-five Dollars ($26,565.00), but not less than Nine Thousand Six Hundred Sixty Dollars ($9,660.00).

For counties with a total population of more than fifty thousand (50,000) and not more than one hundred thousand (100,000), an amount not to exceed Twenty-four Thousand One Hundred Fifty Dollars ($24,150.00), but not less than Nine Thousand Six Hundred Sixty Dollars ($9,660.00).

For counties with a total population of more than thirty-five thousand (35,000) and not more than fifty thousand (50,000), an amount not to exceed Twenty-one Thousand Seven Hundred Thirty-five Dollars ($21,735.00), but not less than Nine Thousand Six Hundred Sixty Dollars ($9,660.00).

For counties with a total population of more than twenty-five thousand (25,000) and not more than thirty-five thousand (35,000), an amount not to exceed Nineteen Thousand Three Hundred Twenty Dollars ($19,320.00), but not less than Nine Thousand Six Hundred Sixty Dollars ($9,660.00).

For counties with a total population of more than fifteen thousand (15,000) and not more than twenty-five thousand (25,000), an amount not to exceed Sixteen Thousand Nine Hundred Five Dollars ($16,905.00), but not less than Nine Thousand Six Hundred Sixty Dollars ($9,660.00).

For counties with a total population of more than ten thousand (10,000) and not more than fifteen thousand (15,000), an amount not to exceed Fourteen Thousand Four Hundred Ninety Dollars ($14,490.00), but not less than Eight Thousand Four Hundred Fifty-two Dollars and Fifty Cents ($8,452.50).

For counties with a total population of more than six thousand (6,000) and not more than ten thousand (10,000), an amount not to exceed Twelve Thousand Seventy-five Dollars ($12,075.00), but not less than Eight Thousand Four Hundred Fifty-two Dollars and Fifty Cents ($8,452.50).

For counties with a total population of not more than six thousand (6,000), an amount not to exceed Nine Thousand Six Hundred Sixty Dollars ($9,660.00) but not less than Six Thousand Six Hundred Forty-one Dollars and Twenty-five Cents ($6,641.25).

For counties having two (2) judicial districts, the board of supervisors of the county may allow, in addition to the sums prescribed herein, in its discretion, an amount not to exceed Eleven Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($11,500.00).

In the event of a reregistration within such county, or a redistricting that necessitates the hiring of additional deputy registrars, the board of supervisors, in its discretion, may by contract compensate the county registrar amounts in addition to the sums prescribed herein.

As compensation for their services in assisting the county election commissioners in performance of their duties in the revision of the voter roll as electronically maintained by the Statewide Elections Management System and in assisting the election commissioners, executive committees or boards of supervisors in connection with any election, the registrar shall receive the same daily per diem and limitation on meeting days as provided for the board of election commissioners as set out in Sections 23-15-153 and 23-15-227 to be paid from the general fund of the county.

In any case where an amount has been allowed by the board of supervisors pursuant to this section, such amount shall not be reduced or terminated during the term for which the registrar was elected.

The circuit clerk shall, in addition to any other compensation provided for by law, be entitled to receive as compensation from the board of supervisors the amount of Two Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($2,500.00) per year. This payment shall be for the performance of his or her duties in regard to the conduct of elections and the performance of his or her other duties.

The municipal clerk shall, in addition to any other compensation for performance of duties, be eligible to receive as compensation from the municipality’s governing authorities a reasonable amount of additional compensation for reimbursement of costs and for additional duties associated with mail-in registration of voters.

The board of supervisors shall not allow any additional compensation authorized under this section for services as county registrar to any circuit clerk who is receiving fees as compensation for his or her services equal to the limitation on compensation prescribed in Section 9-1-43.

HISTORY:
Derived from 1972 Code §23-5-53 [Codes, 1880, § 116; 1892, § 3622; 1906, § 4129; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6763; 1930, § 6195; 1942, § 3223; Laws, 1964, ch. 510, § 1; Laws, 1977, ch. 335; Laws, 1981, ch. 500, § 1; Laws, 1983, ch. 519; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 335]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 61; Laws, 1991, ch. 440, § 6; Laws, 1997, ch. 570, § 7; Laws, 2008, ch. 473, § 2; brought forward without change, Laws, 2016, ch. 326, § 4; Laws, 2017, ch. 441, § 44, eff from and after July 1, 2017; brought forward without change, Laws, 2018, ch. 399, Laws, 2018, ch. 399, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 2018; Laws, 2019, ch. 485, § 2, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2020, eff from and after July 1, 2018; Laws, 2019, ch. 485, § 2,, eff from and after January 1, 2020.

§ 23-15-227.
Compensation of poll managers.

The poll managers shall be each entitled to Seventy-five Dollars ($75.00) for each election; however, the board of supervisors may, in its discretion, pay the poll managers an additional amount not to exceed Fifty Dollars ($50.00) per election.

The poll manager who shall carry to the place of voting, away from the courthouse, the official ballots, ballot boxes, pollbooks and other necessities, shall be allowed Ten Dollars ($10.00) for each voting precinct for so doing. The poll manager who acts as returning officer shall be allowed Ten Dollars ($10.00) for each voting precinct for that service. If a person who performs the duties described in this subsection uses a privately owned motor vehicle to perform them, he or she shall receive for each mile actually and necessarily traveled in excess of ten (10) miles, the mileage reimbursement rate allowable to federal employees for the use of a privately owned vehicle while on official travel.

The compensation authorized in this section shall be allowed by the board of supervisors, and shall be payable out of the county treasury.

The compensation provided in this section shall constitute payment in full for the services rendered by the persons named for any election, whether there be one (1) election or issue voted upon, or more than one (1) election or issue voted upon at the same time.

HISTORY:
Derived from 1972 Code §23-5-183 [Codes, 1892, § 3706; 1906, § 4213; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6849; 1930, § 6257; 1942, § 3286; Laws, 1932, ch. 298; Laws, 1938, ch. 306; Laws, 1950, ch. 281; Laws, 1960, ch. 452, § 1; Laws, 1966 ch. 614, § 1; Laws, 1970, ch. 511, § 1; Laws, 1973, ch. 401 § 1; Laws, 1975, ch. 497, § 2; Laws, 1979, ch. 487, § 3; Laws, 1983, ch. 510; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 335]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 62; Laws, 1987, ch. 499, § 16; Laws, 1988 ch. 402, § 1; Laws, 1995, ch. 446, § 1; Laws, 2007, ch. 434, § 5; Laws, 2013, ch. 366, § 1; brought forward without change, Laws, 2016, ch. 326, § 5; Laws, 2017, ch. 441, § 45, eff from and after July 1, 2017.

§ 23-15-229.
Compensation of municipal poll managers and other workers.

The compensation for poll managers and other workers in the polling places of a municipality shall be the same as the compensation paid by the county for those services; provided, however, that the governing authorities of a municipality shall not be required to pay any additional compensation authorized by the board of supervisors. The governing authorities of a municipality may, in their discretion, pay clerks and poll managers in the polling places of the municipality an additional amount of compensation not to exceed Fifty Dollars ($50.00) per election.

HISTORY:
Derived from 1972 Code §23-5-184 [Laws, 1973, ch. 346, § 1; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 335]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 63; Laws, 1995, ch. 446, § 2; Laws, 2016, ch. 326, § 1; Laws, 2017, ch. 441, § 46, eff from and after July 1, 2017.